Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.320

Employment of minors.

A person seeking a work permit for the employment of minors under RCW 49.12.121 is not required to complete an entirely new *master application if there are no changes to any other information submitted on the most recent *master application. The person need only complete the parts of a new *master application that identify the employer seeking the minor work permit, including address and contact information, and that indicate the employer plans to employ one or more minors, the duties to be performed by minors, and the estimated number of hours to be worked by minors.

[ 2013 c 156 s 1.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "master application" was changed to "business license application" by chapter 144, Laws of 2013.